Washington statutes.
RCW 19.146.215

Continuing education—Rules.

The designated broker of every licensee shall complete an annual continuing education requirement. The director shall establish standards in rule for approval of professional organizations offering continuing education to designated brokers. The director may approve continuing education taken by designated brokers in other states if the director is satisfied that such continuing education meets the requirements of the continuing education required by this chapter.

[ 2006 c 19 s 12; 1997 c 106 s 11; 1994 c 33 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1997 c 106: See note following RCW 19.146.010.